District of Columbia statutes.
7-2002

Child Care Services Assistance Fund; established.

(a)

There is established a revolving Child Care Services Assistance Fund, to be administered by the Mayor, for the purpose of providing loans and grants of up to $500,000 to open new child care facilities or to expand, repair, or improve existing child care facilities in the District, including a child development center or a child development home.

(b)

There is authorized to be appropriated out of the revenue of the District an amount necessary to carry out the purposes of this subchapter.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-220, § 3, 36 DCR 550
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-192, § 5183, 53 DCR 6899
This section is referenced in § 7-2001.
1981 Ed., § 6-3602.
D.C. Law 16-192, in subsec. (a), substituted “up to $500,000” for “up to $10,000”.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of Day Care Grant-Making and Rulemaking Temporary Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Law 16-156, September 19, 2006, law notification 53 DCR 7928).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 5183 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-477, August 8, 2006, 53 DCR 7068).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 5183 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-499, October 23, 2006, 53 DCR 8845).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 5183 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-1, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1165).
Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 7-220, the “Child Care Services Assistance Fund Act of 1988”, see Mayor’s Order 89-131, June 9, 1989.
Delegation of Mayor’s Authority to Administer the Child Care Services Assistance Fund to the office of the State Superintendent of Education, see Mayor’s Order 2008-91, June 24, 2008 ( 55 DCR 9371).
Because of the codification of D.C. Law 12-215 as subchapter II of this chapter, and the designation of the preexisting text as subchapter I, “subchapter” has been substituted for “chapter” in subsection (b).